Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.050

When deemed affixed.

A label, trademark, term, design, device or form of advertisement shall be deemed to be affixed to any goods, wares, merchandise, mixture, preparation or compound whenever it is in any manner placed in or upon either the article itself, or the box, bale, barrel, bottle, case, cask or other vessel or package, or the cover, wrapper, stopper, brand, label or other thing in, by or with which the goods are packed, enclosed or otherwise prepared for sale or distribution.

[ 1909 c 249 s 346; RRS s 2598.]